Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.581

Early learning facilities grant and loan program—Committee of facilities experts—Advice regarding prioritization methodology—Liability insurance.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1314.SL) ***

(1) The department shall convene a committee of early learning facilities experts to advise the department regarding the prioritization methodology of applications for projects described in RCW 43.31.577 including no less than one representative each from the department of children, youth, and families, the Washington state housing finance commission, an organization certified by the community development financial institutions fund, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) When developing a prioritization methodology under this section, the committee shall consider, but is not limited to:

(a) Projects that add part-day, full-day, or extended day early childhood education and assistance program slots in areas with the highest unmet need;

(b) Projects benefiting low-income children;

(c) Projects located in low-income neighborhoods;

(d) Projects that provide more access to the early childhood education and assistance program as a ratio of the children eligible to participate in the program;

(e) Projects that are geographically disbursed relative to statewide need;

(f) Projects that include new or renovated kitchen facilities equipped to support the use of from scratch, modified scratch, or other cooking methods that enhance overall student nutrition;

(g) Projects that balance mixed-use development and rural locations; and

(h) Projects that maximize resources available from the state with funding from other public and private organizations, including the use of state lands or facilities.

(3) Committee members shall serve without compensation, but may request reimbursement for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) Committee members are not liable to the state, the early learning facilities revolving account, the early learning facilities development account, or to any other person, as a result of their activities, whether ministerial or discretionary, as members except for willful dishonesty or intentional violation of the law.

(5) The department may purchase liability insurance for members and may indemnify these persons against the claims of others.

[2018 c 58 s 17; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 43.31.565.